Massachusetts, session 194th, H2956.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision (2) of section 5 of chapter 32 of the General
Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is amended by inserting in line 142 after the
word “dollars” the following words:- or upon acceptance of paragraph (b 1/2) fifty dollars.
SECTION 2. Paragraph (b) of subdivision (2) of section 5 of said chapter 32, as so
appearing, is further amended by deleting in line 145 the words “in any case” and inserting in
place thereof the following words:- or upon acceptance of paragraph (b 1/2) one thousand
dollars.
SECTION 3. Subdivision (2) of section 5 of said chapter 32 is hereby further amended by
inserting the following new paragraph:-
(b 1/2) Upon acceptance of this provision by a retirement system, any member of Group
1 or Group 2 or Group 4, who is a veteran as defined in section one, shall receive, in lieu of
paragraph (b), an additional yearly allowance of fifty dollars for each year of creditable service
of 3

or fraction thereof; provided, that the total amount of said additional retirement allowance shall
not exceed one thousand dollars in any case. Acceptance of this provision by a retirement system
shall be by a majority vote of the board of each such system, subject to the approval of the
legislative body. For the purposes herein, “legislative body” shall mean, in the case of a city, the
city council in accordance with its charter, in the case of a town, the town meeting, in the case of
a county, the county retirement board advisory council, in the case of a region, the regional
retirement board advisory council, in the case of a district, the district members, and, in the case
of an authority, the governing body. Acceptance shall be deemed to have occurred upon the
filing of a certification of such votes with the commission. For purposes herein, the state
teachers’ and state employees’ retirement systems shall be deemed to have accepted this
provision.
SECTION 4. Paragraph (e) of subdivision (2) of section 7 of said chapter 32, as
appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is amended by inserting in line 160 after the dollar
amount “$15” the following words:- or upon acceptance of paragraph (f) $50; and is further
amended by inserting in line 162 after the dollar amount “$300” the following words:- or upon
acceptance of paragraph (f) $1,000.
SECTION 5. Subdivision (2) of section 7 of said chapter 32 is hereby further amended by
inserting at the end thereof the following new paragraph:-
(f) Upon acceptance of this provision by a retirement system, any member of Group 1 or
Group 2 or Group 4, who is a veteran as defined in section one, shall receive, in lieu of paragraph
(b), an additional yearly allowance of fifty dollars for each year of creditable service or fraction
thereof; provided, that the total amount of said additional retirement allowance shall not exceed
of 3

one thousand dollars in any case. Acceptance of this provision by a retirement system shall be by
a majority vote of the board of each such system, subject to the approval of the legislative body.
For the purposes herein, “legislative body” shall mean, in the case of a city, the city council in
accordance with its charter, in the case of a town, the town meeting, in the case of a county, the
county retirement board advisory council, in the case of a region, the regional retirement board
advisory council, in the case of a district, the district members, and, in the case of an authority,
the governing body. Acceptance shall be deemed to have occurred upon the filing of a
certification of such votes with the commission. For purposes herein, the state teachers’ and state
employees’ retirement systems shall be deemed to have accepted this provision.
SECTION 6. Paragraph (c) of subdivision (2) of section 26 of said chapter 32, as
appearing, is amended by deleting in line 131 the dollar amount “$15”and inserting in place
thereof the following dollar amount:- $50; and is further amended by deleting in line 134 the
dollar amount $300 and inserting in place thereof the following dollar amount:- $1,000.
SECTION 7. The provisions of this act shall be prospective from the date of acceptance
of this act and shall not entitle a member, who is entitled to the benefits provided under this act,
to any retroactive benefits.
of 3